New York, session 2025-2026, A8304.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The family court act is amended by adding a new section 2 829 to read as follows: 3 § 829. Adjournment in contemplation of dismissal. 1. Prior to or upon 4 a fact-finding hearing, with the consent of the petitioner and the 5 respondent and with the approval of the court, a proceeding may be 6 adjourned in contemplation of dismissal. The court shall consider the 7 position of the attorney for the child, if one has been appointed. Under 8 no circumstances shall the court order any party to consent to an order 9 under this section. 10 2. An adjournment in contemplation of dismissal shall be an adjourn- 11 ment of the proceeding for a period not to exceed one year with a view 12 to ultimate dismissal of the petition in furtherance of justice. 13 3. Such order of adjournment in contemplation of dismissal may include 14 terms and conditions agreeable to the parties and to the court. The 15 court may, as a condition of such order, issue a temporary order of 16 protection in accordance with section eight hundred twenty-eight of this 17 part. The duration of the temporary order of protection may not exceed 18 the length of the adjournment in contemplation of dismissal. Compliance 19 with the temporary order of protection shall be a condition of the order 20 of adjournment in contemplation of dismissal. 21 4. Upon consent of the petitioner and respondent, upon consideration 22 of the position of the attorney for the child, if one has been 23 appointed, and with the approval of the court, the court may issue an 24 order extending the adjournment in contemplation of dismissal for an EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07886-01-5 A. 8304 2 1 additional period of up to one year upon terms and conditions agreeable 2 to the parties and to the court. 3 5. Upon application of the petitioner alleging a violation of such 4 order of adjournment, or upon the court's own motion, made at any time 5 during the duration of the adjournment in contemplation of dismissal, 6 the court may restore the matter to the calendar if the court finds 7 after a hearing based upon competent, relevant and material evidence 8 that the respondent has failed to comply with the terms and conditions 9 of the order. Pending a determination after a hearing, the court may 10 toll the expiration of any of the provisions of the order of adjournment 11 in contemplation of dismissal, modify and/or extend the temporary order 12 of protection or issue a new temporary order of protection. 13 6. If the proceeding is not restored to the calendar at the expiration 14 of the adjournment period, the petition is deemed to have been dismissed 15 by the court in furtherance of justice, unless an application is pending 16 pursuant to subdivision four of this section. If the application to 17 restore the petition is granted, the petition shall not be dismissed and 18 unless the parties agree to extend the order or to dismissal of the 19 petition, the court shall proceed either to a fact-finding hearing or to 20 a dispositional hearing, if such order was issued after fact-finding. 21 § 2. Subdivision (e) of section 841 of the family court act, as added 22 by chapter 222 of the laws of 1994, is amended and a new subdivision 23 (f) is added to read as follows: 24 (e) directing payment of restitution in an amount not to exceed ten 25 thousand dollars. An order of restitution may be made in conjunction 26 with any order of disposition authorized under [subdivisions] subdivi- 27 sion (b), (c), [or] (d), or (f) of this section. In no case shall an 28 order of restitution be issued where the court determines that the 29 respondent has already paid such restitution as part of the disposition 30 or settlement of another proceeding arising from the same act or acts 31 alleged in the petition before the court[.]; or 32 (f) adjourning the petition in contemplation of dismissal in accord- 33 ance with section eight hundred twenty-nine of this article. 34 § 3. Section 1039 of the family court act, as amended by chapter 707 35 of the laws of 1975, subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d) and (e) as amended 36 by chapter 41 of the laws of 2010 and subdivision (f) as amended by 37 chapter 601 of the laws of 1985, is amended to read as follows: 38 § 1039. Adjournment in contemplation of dismissal. (a) (i) Prior to 39 [or upon] the entry of a fact-finding [hearing] order, the court may, 40 upon a motion by [the petitioner with the consent of the respondent and] 41 any party or the child's attorney with the consent of all parties and 42 the child's attorney, or upon its own motion with the consent of [the 43 petitioner, the respondent] all parties and the child's attorney, order 44 that the proceeding be ["]adjourned in contemplation of dismissal[". 45 Under no circumstances shall the court order any party to consent to an 46 order under this section]. 47 (ii) After entry of a fact-finding order but prior to the entry of a 48 dispositional order, the court may, with consent of the respondent and 49 upon motion of any party or the child's attorney or upon its own motion 50 without requiring the consent of the petitioner or attorney for the 51 child, order that the proceeding be adjourned in contemplation of 52 dismissal. The petitioner, respondent and attorney for the child have a 53 right to be heard with respect to the motion. 54 (iii) The court may make [such] an order under this section only after 55 it has apprised the respondent of the provisions of this section and it 56 is satisfied that the respondent understands the effect of such A. 8304 3 1 provisions. Under no circumstances shall the court order any party to 2 consent to an order under this section. The court shall state its 3 reasons on the record for ordering an adjournment in contemplation of 4 dismissal under this section. 5 (b) An adjournment in contemplation of dismissal is an adjournment of 6 the proceeding for a period not to exceed one year with a view to ulti- 7 mate dismissal of the petition in furtherance of justice. In the case 8 of an adjournment in contemplation of dismissal after the entry of a 9 fact-finding order, such dismissal includes vacatur of the fact-finding 10 order. 11 (i) Upon the consent of the petitioner, the respondent and the child's 12 attorney, the court may issue an order extending [such] the period of an 13 adjournment in contemplation of dismissal issued pursuant to paragraph 14 (i) of subdivision (a) of this section prior to the entry of a fact- 15 finding order for such time and upon such conditions as may be agreeable 16 to the parties. 17 (ii) For good cause shown and with the consent of the respondent, the 18 court may, on its own motion or on motion of any party or the attorney 19 for the child and after providing notice and an opportunity to be heard 20 to all parties and the attorney for the child, issue an order extending 21 an adjournment in contemplation of dismissal issued pursuant to para- 22 graph (ii) of subdivision (a) of this section after entry of a fact- 23 finding order for such time and upon such conditions as may be in the 24 best interests of the child or children who are the subjects of the 25 proceeding. 26 (iii) The court shall state its reasons on the record for extending an 27 adjournment in contemplation of dismissal under this subdivision, 28 including its reasons for changes in the terms and conditions, if any. 29 (c) [Such] The order [may] shall include terms and conditions [agree- 30 able to the parties and to the court, provided that such terms and 31 conditions] in furtherance of the best interests of the child or chil- 32 dren who are the subjects of the proceeding and shall include, but not 33 be limited to, a requirement that the child and the respondent be under 34 the supervision of a child protective agency during the adjournment 35 period. Except as provided in subdivision (g) of this section, an order 36 pursuant to subparagraphs (i) and (iii) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 37 two of section one thousand seventeen, paragraphs (iii), (vi), and (vii) 38 of subdivision (a) of section one thousand fifty-two, section one thou- 39 sand fifty-five or section one thousand fifty-five-b of this article 40 shall not be made in any case adjourned under this section; nor shall an 41 order under this section contain a condition requiring the child or 42 children to be placed voluntarily pursuant to sections three hundred 43 fifty-eight and three hundred eighty-four-a of the social services law. 44 In any order issued pursuant to this section, [such agency] the peti- 45 tioner shall be directed to make a progress report to the court, the 46 parties and the child's attorney on the implementation of such order, no 47 later than ninety days after the issuance of such order[, unless the 48 court determines that the facts and circumstances of the case do not 49 require such reports to be made] and shall submit a report pursuant to 50 section one thousand fifty-eight of this article no later than sixty 51 days prior to the expiration of the order. The [child protective agency] 52 petitioner shall make further reports to the court, the parties and the 53 child's attorney in such manner and at such times as the court may 54 direct. 55 (d) Upon application of the respondent, the petitioner[,] or the 56 child's attorney or upon the court's own motion, made at any time during A. 8304 4 1 the duration of the order, if the child protective agency has failed 2 substantially to provide the respondent with adequate supervision or to 3 observe the terms and conditions of the order, the court may direct the 4 child protective agency to observe such terms and conditions and provide 5 adequate supervision or may make any order authorized pursuant to 6 section two hundred fifty-five or one thousand fifteen-a of this act. 7 (e) [Upon application of] If, prior to the expiration of the period of 8 an adjournment in contemplation of dismissal, a motion or order to show 9 cause is filed by the petitioner or the child's attorney or upon the 10 court's own motion, made at any time during the duration of the order, 11 [the] that alleges a violation of the terms and conditions of the 12 adjournment, the period of the adjournment in contemplation of dismissal 13 is tolled as of the date of such filing until the entry of an order 14 disposing of the motion or order to show cause. The court may revoke 15 the adjournment in contemplation of dismissal and restore the matter to 16 the calendar or the court may extend the period of the adjournment in 17 contemplation of dismissal pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section, 18 if the court finds after a hearing on the alleged violation that the 19 respondent has failed substantially to observe the terms and conditions 20 of the order or to cooperate with the supervising child protective agen- 21 cy. [In such event] Where the court has revoked the adjournment in 22 contemplation of dismissal and restored the matter to the calendar: 23 (i) in the case of an adjournment in contemplation of dismissal issued 24 prior to the entry of a fact-finding order, unless the parties consent 25 to an order pursuant to section one thousand fifty-one of this [act] 26 article or unless the petition is dismissed upon the consent of the 27 petitioner, the court shall thereupon proceed to a fact-finding hearing 28 under this article no later than sixty days after [such] the application 29 to restore the matter to the calendar has been granted, unless such 30 period is extended by the court for good cause shown; or 31 (ii) in the case of an adjournment in contemplation of dismissal 32 issued after the entry of a fact-finding order, the court shall thereup- 33 on proceed to a dispositional hearing under this article no later than 34 thirty days after the application to restore the matter to the calendar 35 has been granted, unless such period is extended by the court for good 36 cause shown. 37 (iii) The court shall state its reasons on the record for revoking an 38 adjournment in contemplation of dismissal and restoring the matter to 39 the calendar under this subdivision. 40 (f) If the proceeding is not [so] restored to the calendar as a result 41 of a finding of an alleged violation pursuant to subdivision (e) of this 42 section and if the adjournment in contemplation of dismissal is not 43 extended pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section, the petition is, 44 at the expiration of the adjournment in contemplation of dismissal peri- 45 od, deemed to have been dismissed by the court in furtherance of justice 46 [unless an application is pending pursuant to subdivision (e) of this 47 section]. If [such application is granted] the court finds a violation 48 pursuant to subdivision (e) of this section, the petition shall not be 49 dismissed and shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of such 50 subdivision (e). 51 (g) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if a motion or 52 order to show cause is filed alleging a violation pursuant to subdivi- 53 sion (e) of this section and the court finds that removal of the child 54 from the home is necessary pursuant to section one thousand twenty-seven 55 of this article during the pendency of the violation motion or order to 56 show cause, the court[,] may, at any time prior to dismissal of the A. 8304 5 1 petition pursuant to subdivision (f) of this section, issue an order 2 authorized pursuant to section one thousand twenty-seven of this arti- 3 cle. Nothing in this section shall preclude the child protective agency 4 from taking emergency action pursuant to section one thousand twenty- 5 four of this article where compelled by the terms of that section. If 6 the violation is found and the matter is restored to the calendar, the 7 court may make further orders in accordance with subdivision (e) of this 8 section. 9 § 4. Section 1053 of the family court act, as added by chapter 962 of 10 the laws of 1970 and subdivision (c) as amended by chapter 41 of the 11 laws of 2010, is amended to read as follows: 12 § 1053. Suspended judgment. (a) Rules of court shall define permissi- 13 ble terms and conditions of a suspended judgment. These terms and condi- 14 tions shall relate to the acts or omissions of the parent or other 15 person legally responsible for the care of the child. 16 (b) The maximum duration of any term or condition of a suspended judg- 17 ment is one year, unless the court finds at the conclusion of that peri- 18 od, upon a hearing, that exceptional circumstances require an extension 19 thereof for a period of up to an additional year. The court shall state 20 its reasons on the record for extending a period of suspended judgment 21 under this subdivision, including its reasons for changes in the terms 22 and conditions, if any. 23 (c) Except as provided for herein, in any order issued pursuant to 24 this section, the court may require the child protective agency to make 25 progress reports to the court, the parties, and the child's attorney on 26 the implementation of such order. Where the order of disposition is 27 issued upon the consent of the parties and the child's attorney, such 28 agency shall report to the court, the parties and the child's attorney 29 no later than ninety days after the issuance of the order, unless the 30 court determines that the facts and circumstances of the case do not 31 require such report to be made. 32 (d) The order of suspended judgment must set forth the duration, terms 33 and conditions of the suspended judgment, and must contain a date 34 certain for a court review not later than thirty days prior to the expi- 35 ration of the period of suspended judgment. The order of suspended judg- 36 ment also must state in conspicuous print that a failure to obey the 37 order may lead to its revocation and to the issuance of any order that 38 might have been made at the time judgment was suspended. A copy of the 39 order of suspended judgment must be furnished to the respondent. 40 (e) Not later than sixty days before the expiration of the period of 41 suspended judgment, the petitioner shall file a report, pursuant to 42 section one thousand fifty-eight of this part, with the family court and 43 all parties, including the respondent and such respondent's attorney, 44 the attorney for the child and intervenors, if any, regarding the 45 respondent's compliance with the terms of the suspended judgment. The 46 report shall be reviewed by the court on the scheduled court date. 47 Unless a motion or order to show cause has been filed prior to the expi- 48 ration of the period of suspended judgment alleging a violation or seek- 49 ing an extension of the period of the suspended judgment, the terms of 50 the disposition of suspended judgment shall be deemed satisfied. In such 51 event, the court's jurisdiction over the proceeding shall be terminated. 52 However, the order of fact-finding and the presumptive effect of such 53 finding upon retention of the report of suspected abuse and neglect on 54 the state central register in accordance with paragraph (b) of subdivi- 55 sion eight of section four hundred twenty-two of the social services law 56 shall remain in effect unless the court grants a motion by the respond- A. 8304 6 1 ent to vacate the order of fact-finding pursuant to section one thousand 2 sixty-one of this article. 3 § 5. Section 1071 of the family court act, as amended by chapter 437 4 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 1071. Failure to comply with terms and conditions of suspended judg- 6 ment. If, prior to the expiration of the period of the suspended judg- 7 ment, a motion or order to show cause is filed that alleges that a 8 parent or other person legally responsible for a child's care violated 9 the terms and conditions of a suspended judgment issued under section 10 one thousand fifty-three of this article, the period of the suspended 11 judgment shall be tolled as of the date of such filing pending disposi- 12 tion of the motion or order to show cause. If a motion or order to show 13 cause alleging a violation has been filed and the court finds that 14 removal of the child from the home pending disposition of the motion or 15 order to show cause is necessary pursuant to section one thousand twen- 16 ty-seven of this article, the court may issue an order pursuant to such 17 section one thousand twenty-seven. Nothing in this section shall 18 preclude the child protective agency from taking emergency action pursu- 19 ant to section one thousand twenty-four of this article where compelled 20 by the terms of that section. If, after a hearing on the alleged 21 violation, the court is satisfied by competent proof that the parent or 22 other person violated the order of suspended judgment, the court may 23 revoke the suspension of judgment and enter any order that might have 24 been made at the time judgment was suspended or may extend the period of 25 suspended judgment pursuant to subdivision (b) of section one thousand 26 fifty-three of this article. The court shall state its reasons for 27 revoking or extending a period of suspended judgment under this section. 28 § 6. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 29 have become a law.